Nebraska, session 109, LB882.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB882 LB882
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3506 (1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for
taxation the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt
from taxation, on any homestead described in subsection (2) of this
section, one hundred percent of the exempt amount.
(2) The exemption described in subsection (1) of this section shall
apply to homesteads of:
(a) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of (i) one hundred percent service-connected permanent
disability or (ii) assignment of total disability rating for compensation
pursuant to 38 C.F.R. 4.16, and who is not eligible for total exemption
under sections 77-3526 to 77-3528;
(b) An unremarried surviving spouse of a veteran described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a surviving spouse of such a
veteran who remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(c) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of one hundred percent service-connected temporary
disability, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections
77-3526 to 77-3528, an unremarried spouse of such a veteran, or a
surviving spouse of such a veteran who remarries after attaining the age
of fifty-seven years;
(d) An unremarried surviving spouse of any veteran, including a
veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01, who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions) and who died because of a service-
connected disability or a surviving spouse of such a veteran who
-2-

LB882 LB882
2026 2026
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(e) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman,
including a veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01,
whose death while on active duty was service-connected or a surviving
spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who remarries after attaining
the age of fifty-seven years; and
(f) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman
who died while on active duty during the periods described in section
80-401.01 or a surviving spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years.
(3) Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(a), (b), or (f)
of this section shall not be required in any every subsequent year evenly
divisible by five and shall include certification of the status described
in subdivision (2)(a) of this section from the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs. Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(c)
(2)(b), (c), (d), or (e) , or (f) of this section shall be required
annually and shall include certification of the status described in
subdivision (2)(c) (2)(b), (c), (d), or (e) , or (f) of this section from
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, except that such
certification of status shall only be required in every subsequent year
evenly divisible by five.
(4) If an unremarried surviving spouse who has been granted a
homestead exemption under subdivision (2)(b) or (f) of this section
remarries before attaining the age of fifty-seven years, such spouse
shall lose the homestead exemption. The surviving spouse shall notify the
county assessor of such remarriage within a reasonable time.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3512 (1) It shall be the duty of each owner who wants a homestead
exemption under section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 to file an
application therefor with the county assessor of the county in which the
-3-

LB882 LB882
2026 2026
homestead is located after February 1 and on or before June 30 of each
year, except that:
(a) The county board of the county in which the homestead is located
may, by majority vote, extend the deadline for an applicant to on or
before July 20. An extension shall not be granted to an applicant who
received an extension in the immediately preceding year;
(b) An owner may file a late application pursuant to section
77-3514.01 if he or she includes documentation of a medical condition
which impaired the owner's ability to file the application in a timely
manner;
(c) An owner may file a late application pursuant to section
77-3514.01 if he or she includes a copy of the death certificate of a
spouse who died during the year for which the exemption is requested; and
(d) A veteran or surviving spouse of a veteran, serviceman, or
service woman qualifying for a homestead exemption under subdivision (2)
(a), (b), or (f) of section 77-3506 shall not only be required to file an
application in any every subsequent year. evenly divisible by five; and
(e) If a veteran who has been granted a homestead exemption under
subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3506 dies during the five-year exemption
period, the surviving spouse of such veteran shall continue to receive
such exemption for the remainder of the five-year exemption period. After
the expiration of the five-year exemption period, the surviving spouse
shall be required to file for an exemption under subdivision (2)(b) of
section 77-3506 on an annual basis.
(2) Failure to file an application as required in subsection (1) of
this section shall constitute a waiver of the exemption for the year in
which the failure occurred.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-3512, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-4-